Georgia, session 2025_26, HB838.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act reincorporating and providing a new charter for the City of Newnan, approved
March 31, 1987 (Ga. L. 1987, p. 5160), as amended, particularly by an Act approved
March 21, 1989 (Ga. L. 1989, p. 3914), is amended by adding a new section to read as
follows:
"SECTION 1.2A.
(a) In addition to all other territory included within the corporate limits of said city, the
corporate limits shall specifically include the following described property:
(1) TAX PARCEL 087 2027 008
All that tract or parcel of land situate, lying and being in Land Lot 27 of the 2nd Land
District of Coweta County, Georgia, shown as 17.504 acres as shown on plat of survey
for WOODIE T. WOOD, JR. and NORA ANN WOOD made by Turner & Associates
H. B. 838
- 1 -

LC 47 3665/AP
Land Surveyors, P.C., Registered Land Surveyors, as recorded in Plat Book 94, Page 40,
Office of the Clerk, Coweta County, Georgia Superior Court, reference to which pat is
hereby made for a more particular and accurate description of the property conveyed
herein. -
(2) TAX PARCEL 087 2027 011
ALL THAT TRACT OR PARCEL OF LAND situated, lying and being located in Land
Lot 27 of the second Land District, Coweta County, Georgia, the same and being more
particularly described as follows:
TO FIND THE TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING, First, Start at the point formed by the
easterly varying right-of-way of Newnan By-Pass East and the southerly varying
right-of-way of Poplar Road;
THE FOLLOWING 7 COURSES AND DISTANCES ARE ALONG THE EASTERLY
VARYING RIGHT-OF-WAY OF NEWNAN BY-PASS EAST AS DESCRIBED
ºD.B. 1113 PAGES 199-204:
thence S 00º 26' 04" E a distance of 243.36' to a concrete right-of-way monument found;
thence S 89º 33' 56" W a distance of 50.00' to a concrete right-of-way monument found;
thence S 00º 26' 04" E a distance of 1160.86' to a concrete right-of-way monument found;
thence with a curve turning to the right with an arc length of 562.67', with a radius of
2391.83', with a chord bearing of S 06º 18' 17" W, with a chord length of 561.37', to a
concrete right-of-way monument found;
thence S 76º 57' 21" E a distance of 50.00' to a concrete right-of-way monument found;
thence with a curve turning to the right with an arc length of 278.34', with a radius of
2441.83', with a chord bearing of S 16º 18' 34" W, with a chord length of 278.19', to a
concrete right-of-way monument found;
thence S 19º 34' 30" W a distance of 111.70' to a concrete right-of-way monument found;
H. B. 838
- 2 -

LC 47 3665/AP
thence N 60º 57' 12" W a distance of 304.15' crossing over Newnan By-Pass East to a
1/2" iron rebar set on the westerly varying right-of-way of Newnan By-Pass East and the
TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING OF THE PROPERTY HEREIN DESCRIBED;
thence N 60º 57' 12" W a distance of 111.94' leaving said westerly right-of-way of
Newnan By-Pass East to a ½' iron rebar set;
thence N 53º 27' 18" W a distance of 720.45' to a 1/2'" iron rebar set;
thence S 89º 53' 55" E a distance of 229.30' to a 3/8" iron rebar found;
thence S 89º 49' 49" E a distance of 567.20' to a 1" iron pipe found;
thence S 89º 49' 49" E a distance of 4.28' to a concrete right-of-way monument found on
the westerly varying right-of-way of Newnan By-Pass East;
thence with a curve turning to the right with an arc length of 436.37', with a radius of
2141.83', with a chord bearing of S 13º 44' 20" W, with a chord length of 435.62', along
the said westerly right-of-way of Newnan By-Pass East to a concrete right-of-way
monument found;
thence S 19º 34' 30" W a distance of 61.65' along the said westerly right-of-way of
Newnan By-Pass East to a 1/2" iron rebar set which is the TRUE POINT OF
BEGINNING;
Together with and subject to covenants, easements, and restrictions of record.
Said property contains an area of 4.65 acres.
(b) Reserved."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 838
- 3 -